Arkansas, session 2025, HB1737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-19-102(1), concerning the definition of
"transmitting utility" under the Transmitting Utility Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Transmitting utility" means any a corporation or other
entity primarily engaged in:
(A) the The railroad or street railway business,;
(B) the The furnishing of telephone or telegraph service,;
(C) the The transmission of oil, gas, or petroleum
products by pipeline, or;
(D) the The production, transmission, or distribution of
electricity, steam, gas, or water; or
(E) The provision of fiber optic communication service,
broadband internet service, or similar high-speed data transmission services.

*ANS150*
03/10/2025 5:53:05 PM ANS150